Utah statutes.
20A-11-1203.   Public entity prohibited from expending public funds on certain electoral matters.

(1)  Unless specifically required by law, a public entity may not make an expenditure from public funds for political purposes or to influence a ballot proposition.

(2)  Nothing in this chapter prohibits a public official from speaking, campaigning, contributing personal money, or otherwise exercising the public official's individual First Amendment rights for political purposes.

(3)  Nothing in this chapter prohibits a public entity from providing factual information about a ballot proposition to the public, so long as the information grants equal access to both the opponents and proponents of the ballot proposition.

(4)  Nothing in this chapter prohibits a public entity from the neutral encouragement of voters to vote.

(5)  Nothing in this chapter prohibits a public entity from preparing information analyzing the pros and cons of a ballot proposition when requested to do so by the public entity's governing body.

(6)  Nothing in this chapter prohibits an elected official from campaigning or advocating for or against a ballot proposition.

(7)  A violation of this section does not invalidate an otherwise valid election.

